District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.47

Consistency of budget, accounting, and personnel systems.

The Mayor shall implement appropriate procedures to insure that budget, accounting, and personnel control systems and structures are synchronized for budgeting and control purposes on a continuing basis. No employee shall be hired on a full-time or part-time basis unless such position is authorized by act of the Council (or Act of Congress, in the case of a year which is a control year). Employees shall be assigned in accordance with the program, organization, and fund categories specified in the act of the Council (or Act of Congress, in the case of a year which is a control year) authorizing such position. Hiring of temporary employees and temporary employee transfers among programs shall be consistent with applicable acts of the Council (or Acts of Congress, in the case of a year which is a control year) and reprogramming procedures to insure that costs are accurately associated with programs and sources of funding.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 801, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 447
July 25, 2013, D.C. Law 19-321, § 2(g), 60 DCR 1724
Fund accounting, duties of Mayor, see § 47-375.
Sports and entertainment commission, public or private bond sales, see § 3-1413.
This section is referenced in § 47-375.
1981 Ed., § 47-305.
1973 Ed., § 47-225.
D.C. Law 19-321 substituted “act of the Council (or Act of Congress, in the case of a year which is a control year)” for “Act of Congress,” and “acts of the Council (or Acts of Congress, in the case of a year which is a control year)” for “Acts of Congress” throughout the section.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(g) of the Local Budget Autonomy Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-566, January 7, 2013, 59 DCR 15061, applicable as of January 1, 2014, and effective as provided in § 1-203.03.
Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-321 provided that the act shall take effect as provided in § 1-203.03.

Enactment upon adoption of federal legislation: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-254 provided that “§§ 47-101, 47-117, 47-130, 47-301, 47-302, 47-303, 47-304, 47-304.1, 47-305, 47-310, 47-312, 47-317.1 through 47-317.6, 47-321 through 47-325, 47-327 through 47-331, and 47-332 through 47-334 of Title 47 §§ 1-204.41, 1-204.55, 1-204.50, 1-204.42, 1-204.43, 1-204.44, 1-204.46, 1-204.53, 1-204.47, 1-204.48, 1-204.49, 1-204.24a through 1-204.24e, 47-317.06, 1-204.61 through 1-204.65, 1-204.71 through 1-204.75, 1-204.81, 1-204.85, 1-204.86 and 1-204.90, 2001 Ed. of the District of Columbia Code shall be enacted as part of Title 47 upon the adoption by Congress of legislation so enacting these sections.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-321: Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-321 provided that section 2 of the act shall apply as of January 1, 2014.

D.C. Law 19-321 was declared invalid by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia in a memorandum opinion dated May 19, 2014, Civil Action No. 2014-0655. The court held that although the Council of the District of Columbia, the Mayor, and United States District Court for the District of Columbia are powerless to grant to the residents of the District of Columbia full budget autonomy, the United States Congress and the President of the United States are empowered to do so; and concluded that the Budget Autonomy Act was unlawful. See Council of the Dist. of Columbia v. Gray, 42 F. Supp. 3d 134, 2014 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 68055 (2014).

On May 27, 2015, the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit issued Order No. 14-7067, vacating the lower court’s judgment, dismissing the appeal, and remanding the case to the District Court with instructions to remand the case to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. See Council of the Dist. of Columbia v. Bowser, 2015 U.S. App. LEXIS 8881 (2015). The amendments contained in D.C. Law 19-321 are codified in this section.